District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-413

Merger or consolidation restricted.

Repealed.

Dec. 10, 1971, 85 Stat. 580, Pub. L. 92-180, § 13
July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-138, § 78, 41 DCR 3010
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(n), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-413.
1981 Ed., § 29-613.
1973 Ed., § 29-1113.